Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 10 Punitive Provisions

38-2-1077.
Principals.

Any person subject to this article who:

Commits an offense punishable by this article or aids, abets, counsels, commands, or procures its commission; or

Causes an act to be done which if directly performed by that person would be punishable by this article

is a principal.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1077

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 877

.

38-2-1078.
Accessory after the fact.

Any person subject to this article who, knowing that an offense punishable by this article has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent his or her apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1078

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 878

.

38-2-1079.
Conviction of lesser included offense.

An accused may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included in the offense charged or of an attempt to commit either the offense charged or an offense necessarily included therein.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1079

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 879

.

38-2-1080.
Attempts.

An act, done with specific intent to commit an offense under this article, amounting to more than mere preparation and tending, even though failing, to effect its commission is an attempt to commit that offense.

Any person subject to this article who attempts to commit any offense punishable by this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed.

Any person subject to this article may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears on the trial that the offense was consummated.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1080

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 880

.

38-2-1081.
Conspiracy.

Any person subject to this article who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this article shall, if one or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1081

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 881

.

38-2-1082.
Solicitation of desertion, mutiny, misbehavior before the enemy, or sedition.

Any person subject to this article who solicits or advises another or others to desert in violation of Code Section 38-2-1085 or mutiny in violation of Code Section 38-2-1094 shall, if the offense solicited or advised is attempted or committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense; but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed or attempted, the person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this article who solicits or advises another or others to commit an act of misbehavior before the enemy in violation of Code Section 38-2-1099 or sedition in violation of Code Section 38-2-1094 shall, if the offense solicited or advised is committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense; but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed, the person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1082

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 882

.

38-2-1083.
Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person who:

Procures his or her own enlistment or appointment in the organized militia by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her qualifications for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

Procures his or her own separation from the organized militia by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her eligibility for that separation

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1083

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 883

.

38-2-1084.
Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person subject to this article who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the organized militia of any person who is known to him or her to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1084

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 884

.

38-2-1085.
Desertion.

Any member of the organized militia shall be guilty of desertion who:

Without authority goes or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to remain away therefrom permanently;

Quits his or her unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or

Without being regularly separated from the organized militia, enlists or accepts another appointment in the organized militia, or in one of the armed forces of the United States, without fully disclosing the fact that the member has not been regularly separated, or enters any foreign armed service except when authorized by the United States.

Any commissioned officer of the organized militia who, after tender of his or her resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his or her post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away therefrom permanently shall be guilty of desertion.

Any person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished by:

Confinement of not more than ten years or such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the offense is committed in time of war; or

Punishment as a court-martial may direct if the offense occurs at any time other than in time of war.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1085

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Statute of limitations, § 38-2-437.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 885

.

38-2-1086.
Absence without leave.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, without authority:

Fails to go to his or her appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

Goes from his or her place of duty; or

Absents himself or herself or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty at which the person is required to be at the time prescribed.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1086

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Statute of limitations, § 38-2-437.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 886

.

38-2-1087.
Missing movement of ship, aircraft, or unit.

Any person subject to this article who through neglect or design misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which the person is required in the course of duty to move shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1087

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 887

.

38-2-1088.
Contempt toward officials.

Any commissioned officer who uses contemptuous words against the President, the Vice President, Congress, the Secretary of Defense, the secretary of a military department, the Secretary of Homeland Security, or the Governor or General Assembly shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1088

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 888

.

38-2-1089.
Disrespect toward a superior officer.

Any person subject to this article who behaves with disrespect toward his or her superior commissioned officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1089

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 889

.

38-2-1090.
Assaulting or willfully disobeying officer.

Any person subject to this article who:

Strikes his or her superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against said superior commissioned officer while he or she is in the execution of his or her office; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful command of his or her superior commissioned officer

shall be punished, if the offense is committed in time of war, by confinement of not more than ten years or such other punishment as a court-martial may direct, or if the offense is committed at any time other than a time of war, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1090

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 890

.

38-2-1091.
Insubordination toward warrant or noncommissioned officer.

Any warrant officer or enlisted member shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Strikes or assaults a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer while that officer is in the execution of his or her office;

Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer; or

Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer while that officer is in the execution of his or her office.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1091

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 891

.

38-2-1092.
Failure to obey order or regulation.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the organized militia, which it is his or her duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

Is derelict in the performance of his or her duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1092

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 892

.

38-2-1093.
Cruelty and maltreatment of others under one’s command.

Any person subject to this article who is guilty of cruelty toward, or oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to his or her orders shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1093

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 893

.

38-2-1094.
Mutiny and sedition.

Any person subject to this article who:

With intent to usurp or override lawful military authority, refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or otherwise do his or her duty or creates any violence or disturbance shall be guilty of mutiny;

With intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence, or other disturbance against that authority shall be guilty of sedition; or

Fails to do his or her utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in his or her presence, or fails to take all reasonable means to inform his or her superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition which the person knows or has reason to believe is taking place, shall be guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition.

A person who is found guilty of attempted mutiny, mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1094

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Treason and other subversive activities, §

16-11-1

et seq.

Statute of limitations, § 38-2-437.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 894

.

38-2-1095.
Resistance, breach of arrest, and escape.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Resists apprehension;

Flees from apprehension;

Breaks arrest; or

Escapes from custody or confinement.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1095

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 895

.

38-2-1096.
Assistance in a prisoner’s escape.

Any person subject to this article who, without proper authority, releases any prisoner committed to his or her charge, or who through neglect or design suffers any such prisoner to escape, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1096

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 896

.

38-2-1097.
Unlawful detention.

Any person subject to this article who, except as provided by law or regulation, apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1097

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 897

.

38-2-1098.
Noncompliance with procedural rules; unnecessary delay.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this article; or

Knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this article regulating the proceedings before, during, or after trial of an accused.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1098

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 898

.

38-2-1099.
Misbehavior before the enemy.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who before or in the presence of the enemy:

Runs away;

Shamefully abandons, surrenders, or delivers up any command, unit, place, or military property which it is his or her duty to defend;

Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place, or military property;

Casts away his or her arms or ammunition;

Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

Quits his or her place of duty to plunder or pillage;

Causes false alarms in any command, unit, or place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia;

Willfully fails to do his or her utmost to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy any enemy troops, combatants, vessels, aircraft, or any other thing which it is his or her duty so to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy; or

Does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the armed forces belonging to the United States or their allies, to this state, or to another state, when engaged in battle.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1099

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 899

.

38-2-1100.
Compelling surrender.

Any person subject to this article who compels or attempts to compel a commander, an individual in command of the National Guard of another state, or an individual in command of a vessel, aircraft, or other military property or of any body of members of the armed forces, to give it up to an enemy or to abandon it, or who strikes the colors or flag to an enemy without proper authority, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1100

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 900

.

38-2-1101.
Disclosure or improper use of countersign or parole.

Any person subject to this article who in time of war discloses the parole or countersign to any person not entitled to receive it or who gives to another, who is entitled to receive and use the parole or countersign, a different parole or countersign from that which, to his or her knowledge, the person was authorized and required to give, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1101

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 901

.

38-2-1102.
Forcing a safeguard.

Any person subject to this article who forces a safeguard shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1102

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 902

.

38-2-1103.
Captured or abandoned property; trading and looting prohibited.

All persons subject to this article shall secure all public property taken for the service of the United States or this state or another state and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody, or control.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section;

Buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of taken, captured, or abandoned property, whereby the person receives or expects any profit, benefit, or advantage to himself or herself or another directly or indirectly connected with himself or herself; or

Engages in looting or pillaging.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1103

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 38/HB 737.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 903

.

38-2-1104.
Aiding the enemy.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Aids, or attempts to aid, the enemy with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other things; or

Without proper authority, knowingly harbors or protects or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with or holds any intercourse with the enemy, either directly or indirectly.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1104

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Statute of limitations, § 38-2-437.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 904

.

38-2-1105.
Misconduct as prisoner of war.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, while in the hands of the enemy in time of war:

For the purpose of securing favorable treatment by his or her captors acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, or regulation to the detriment of others of whatever nationality held by the enemy as civilian or military prisoners; or

While in a position of authority over such persons maltreats them without justifiable cause.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1105

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 905

.

38-2-1106.
Reserved.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1106

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1107.
Signing false official document; making false official statement.

Any person subject to this article who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document made in the line of duty, knowing it to be false, or makes any other false official statement made in the line of duty, knowing it to be false, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1107

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 907

.

38-2-1108.
Military property; loss, damage, destruction, or wrongful disposition.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, without proper authority:

Takes, sells, or otherwise disposes of any military property of the United States or of another state;

Willfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses any military property of the United States or of another state; or

Willfully or through neglect suffers to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of any military property of the United States or of another state.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1108

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Interference with government property, §

16-7-24

.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 908

.

38-2-1109.
Property other than military property; waste, spoilage, or destruction.

Any person subject to this article who willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and wrongfully takes, sells, destroys, or damages any property of another other than military property of the United States or of another state shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1109

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Procedure for complaint alleging willful damage to property by members of organized militia, § 38-2-576.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 909

.

38-2-1110.
Willful or negligent hazarding of vessel.

Any person subject to this article who willfully and wrongfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States or any organized militia shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this article who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1110

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 910

.

38-2-1111.
Driving while under the influence of drugs or alcohol.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Drives, operates, or physically controls any vehicle, aircraft, or vessel in a reckless or wanton manner or while impaired by a substance as described in subsection (b) of Code Section 38-2-1112.1; or

Drives, operates, or is in actual physical control of any vehicle, aircraft, or vessel while drunk or when the alcohol concentration in the person’s blood is equal to or exceeds 0.08 grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood, as shown by chemical analysis, within three hours after such operation or control, or the person’s breath is equal to or exceeds 0.08 grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath, as shown by chemical analysis, within three hours after such operation or control.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1111

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 38/HB 737.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 911

.

38-2-1112.
Under the influence of alcohol while on duty.

Any person subject to this article, other than a sentinel or lookout, who is found under the influence of alcohol sufficient to impair the rational and full exercise of his or her mental or physical faculties on duty shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1112

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see 10 U.S.C. §§ 912, 913.

38-2-1112.1.
Use, possession, manufacture, distribution, or importation of certain controlled substances; exceptions.

Any person subject to this article who wrongfully uses, possesses, manufactures, distributes, imports into the customs territory of the United States, exports from the United States, or introduces into an installation, vessel, vehicle, or aircraft used by or under the control of the armed forces of the United States or of the organized militia a substance described in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

The substances provided for by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be:

Opium, heroin, cocaine, amphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, methamphetamine, phencyclidine, barbituric acid, and marijuana and any compound or derivative of any such substance;

Any substance not specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection that is listed on a schedule of controlled substances prescribed by the President for the purposes of the Uniform Code of Military Justice of the armed forces of the United States, 10 U.S.C. Section 801, et seq.; and

Any other substance not specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection or contained on a list prescribed by the President under paragraph (2) of this subsection that is listed in schedules I through V of the Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 812.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1112.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 38/HB 737.

38-2-1113.
Drunk or sleeping while standing post.

Any sentinel or lookout who is found under the influence of alcohol sufficient to impair the rational and full exercise of his or her mental or physical faculties or sleeping upon his or her post or leaves it before being regularly relieved shall be punished, if the offense is committed in time of war, by confinement of not more than ten years or other punishment as a court-martial may direct, but if the offense is committed at any time other than in time of war, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1113

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 914

.

38-2-1114.
Reserved.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1114

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1115.
Malingering; feigning illness; self-infliction of injury.

Any person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who for the purpose of avoiding work, duty, or service:

Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse, or derangement; or

Intentionally inflicts self-injury.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1115

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1116.
Riot or breach of peace.

Any person subject to this article who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1116

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 916

.

38-2-1117.
Provoking words or gestures.

Any person subject to this article who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures toward any other person subject to this article shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1117

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 917

.

38-2-1118 through 38-2-1130.
Reserved.

History.

Code 1981, §§

38-2-1118

through 38-2-1130, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1131.
Perjury.

Any person subject to this article is guilty of perjury and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who in a judicial proceeding or in a course of justice willfully and corruptly:

Upon a lawful oath or in any form allowed by law to be substituted for an oath, gives any false testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry; or

In any declaration, certificate, verification, or statement under penalty of perjury, subscribes any false statement material to the issue or matter of inquiry.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1131

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Statute of limitations, § 38-2-437.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 931

.

38-2-1132.
Fraudulent claims against the government.

Any person subject to this article shall, upon conviction, be punished as a court-martial may direct:

Who, knowing it to be false or fraudulent:

Makes any claim against the United States, this state, or any officer thereof; or

Presents to any person in the civil or military service thereof, for approval or payment, any claim against the United States, this state, or any officer thereof;

Who, for the purpose of obtaining the approval, allowance, or payment of any claim against the United States, this state, or any officer thereof:

Makes or uses any writing or other paper or electronic submission knowing it to contain any false or fraudulent statements;

Makes any oath, affirmation, or certification to any fact or to any writing or other paper or electronic submission knowing the oath, affirmation, or certification to be false; or

Forges or counterfeits any signature upon any writing or other paper, or uses any such signature knowing it to be forged or counterfeited;

Who, having charge, possession, custody, or control of any money or other property of the United States or this state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia, knowingly delivers to any person having authority to receive it, any amount thereof less than that for which the person receives a certificate or receipt; or

Who, being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of any property of the United States or this state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia, makes or delivers to any person such writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements therein contained and with intent to defraud the United States or this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1132

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Statute of limitations, § 38-2-437.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 932

.

38-2-1133.
Conduct unbecoming an officer.

Any commissioned officer, cadet, candidate, or midshipman who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1133

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 933

.

38-2-1134.
General provision.

Though not specifically mentioned in this article, all disorders and neglects to the prejudice of good order and discipline in the organized militia and all conduct of a nature to bring discredit upon the organized militia shall be taken cognizance of by a court-martial and punished at the discretion of a military court. However, where a crime constitutes an offense that violates both this article and the criminal laws of the state where the offense occurs or criminal laws of the United States, jurisdiction of the military court shall be determined in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 38-2-1002.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1134

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 934

.